Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-104
Board of Regents; meetings; open to public; closed sessions; record of meetings; expenses.

All meetings of the Board of Regents shall be open to the public. The board may hold closed sessions in accordance with the Open Meetings Act. Public record shall be made and kept of all meetings and proceedings of the board. The regents shall meet at least twice each year at the administration building. They shall receive for their services no compensation, but they may be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1869, § 23, p. 178;

Laws 1877, § 1, p. 58;

Laws 1907, c. 148, § 1, p. 462;

R.S.1913, § 7111;

C.S.1922, § 6743;

C.S.1929, § 85-129;

R.S.1943, § 85-104;

Laws 1975, LB 325, § 8;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 217;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1077;

Laws 2004, LB 821, § 42;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 137.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.